Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Tennessee Alliance for Fitness and Health [Repealed]

4-40-301. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 7; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 3, §§4-40-301 —4-40-305, concerned the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health, created by §4-40-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-302. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 7; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 3, §§4-40-301 —4-40-305, concerned the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health, created by §4-40-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-303. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 7; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 3, §§4-40-301 —4-40-305, concerned the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health, created by §4-40-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-304. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 7; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 3, §§4-40-301 —4-40-305, concerned the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health, created by §4-40-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-305. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 7; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 3, §§4-40-301 —4-40-305, concerned the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health, created by §4-40-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.